Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.230

Intent of testator controlling.

All courts and others concerned in the execution of last wills shall have due regard to the direction of the will, and the true intent and meaning of the testator, in all matters brought before them.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.12.230. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 45; RRS s 1415; prior: Code 1881 s 1338; 1863 p 210 s 75; 1860 p 172 s 42.]